Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 5 Carriers’ Liens

Cross references.

Provisions of T. 11, the “Uniform Commercial Code,” pertaining to liens of carriers, §§

11-7-307

,

11-7-308

.

Establishment of carriers’ liens generally, §

44-14-320

.

46-9-190.
Lien of carrier for fare and baggage charges.

A carrier of passengers shall have a lien on the passengers’ baggage, not only for baggage charges but also for the passengers’ fare. This lien may be foreclosed as described in subsection (b) of this Code section.

Whenever baggage has been transported to destination by any common carrier and is uncalled for or refused by the holder of the baggage check issued therefor and remains uncalled for or refused for six months after its arrival at destination, the carrier may sell the same at public auction to the highest bidder at such place and time as may be designated by the carrier, provided that the carrier shall have published notice containing a general description of the baggage (that is, whether trunk, hand baggage, suitcase, box, bundle, etc.) and the time and place of sale once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation at the place of sale or at the nearest place thereto.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2050; Code 1868, § 2053; Code 1873, § 2079; Code 1882, § 2079; Civil Code 1895, § 2289; Civil Code 1910, § 2743; Code 1933, § 18-401; Ga. L. 1945, p. 235, § 1.

46-9-191.
Lien of carrier for freight charges.

When a carrier has complied with his contract as to transportation, he shall have a lien on the goods for the freight charges and may retain possession until the lien is paid, unless this right is waived by special contract or actual delivery of the goods. If the goods are delivered, the carrier acquires a lien for the freight charges on and may until the lien is paid retain possession of other goods belonging to the debtor which come into the possession of the carrier. The immediately preceding sentence shall not apply to consumer goods which are used or bought for use for personal, family, or household purposes, except when a motor carrier of household goods and office furnishings may retain possession of such goods.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2049; Code 1868, § 2051; Code 1873, § 2077; Code 1882, § 2077; Civil Code 1895, § 2287; Civil Code 1910, § 2741; Code 1933, § 18-402; Ga. L. 1984, p. 693, § 2.

46-9-192.
Priority of carriers’ liens.

A carrier’s liens for charges on the baggage of its passengers and on the goods and articles transported shall be superior to other liens, except liens for taxes, special liens of landlords for rent, liens of laborers, and all general liens of which the carrier had actual notice before the property claimed to be subject to lien came into their control.

History.

Ga. L. 1873, p. 42, § 13; Code 1873, § 1986; Code 1882, § 1986; Civil Code 1895, § 2810; Civil Code 1910, § 3360; Code 1933, § 18-403.